Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.420

Factory assembled structures advisory board.

There is hereby created a factory assembled structures advisory board consisting of at least 11 members to be appointed by the director of labor and industries. It shall be the purpose and function of the board to advise the director on all matters pertaining to the enforcement of this chapter including but not limited to standards of body and frame design, construction and plumbing, heating and electrical installations, minimum inspection procedures, the adoption of rules pertaining to the manufacture of factory assembled structures, manufactured homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicles, and park trailers. The advisory board shall periodically review the rules adopted under RCW 43.22.450 through 43.22.490 and shall recommend changes of such rules to the department if it deems changes advisable.

The members of the advisory board shall be representative of consumers, the regulated industries, and allied trades and professionals. When appointing members, the director must consider the gender, racial, ethnic, and geographic diversity of the state, including the interests of persons with disabilities. The term of each member shall be four years and members must apply for reappointment if terms would be consecutive. However, the director may appoint the initial members of the advisory board to staggered terms not exceeding four years.

The chief inspector or any person acting as chief inspector for the factory assembled structures, manufactured or mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicle, and park trailer section shall serve as secretary of the board during his tenure as chief. Meetings of the board shall be called at the discretion of the director of labor and industries, but at least quarterly. Each member of the board shall be paid travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 which shall be paid out of the appropriation to the department of labor and industries, upon vouchers approved by the director of labor and industries or his or her designee.

[ 2023 c 36 s 1; 2001 c 335 s 2; 1999 c 22 s 9; 1995 c 280 s 13; 1987 c 330 s 601; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 103; 1971 ex.s. c 82 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 27 s 9; 1969 ex.s. c 229 s 3.]

NOTES:

Application—2001 c 335: See note following RCW 43.22.335.

Construction—Application of rules—Severability—1987 c 330: See notes following RCW 28B.12.050.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.